South Dakota, session 2026, SB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 25-4A-21 be AMENDED:
25-4A-21. In any custody dispute between parents, upon application Upon the
petition of either parent, the court shall consider granting joint for the initial determination
of physical custody of a minor child, there is a rebuttable presumption that joint physical
custody is in the best interest of a minor child. This presumption may be rebutted by
evidence showing that joint physical custody is not in the best interest of the child based
on the factors set forth in § 25-4A-24.
The court shall consider the factors set forth in § 25-4A-24, and shall make written
findings of fact and conclusions of law regarding the best interests interest of the minor
child, unless waived by both parties in accordance with § 25-4A-24, unless waived by both
parties or the parents have stipulated to the terms of an agreement resolving the petition.
The presumption set forth in this section is not applicable if a presumption that
joint physical custody is not in the best interest of the child has been created in accordance
with § 25-4A-22.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 25-4A:
For purposes of this chapter and § 25-5-7.1, "joint physical custody" means a
division of time with the child that is approximately and reasonably equal for each parent,
as agreed to by each parent or as ordered by the court.
Section 3. That § 25-4A-26 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.267.9 2 224
Nothing in §§ 25-4A-21 to 25-4A-27, inclusive, creates a presumption of joint
physical custody. The court shall determine the appropriate physical care, custody, and
control of a minor child based on a determination of the best interests of the child.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.